Utah statutes.
72-10-401.   Definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)  "Airport" means any area of land or water designed and set aside for the landing and taking-off of aircraft and utilized or to be utilized in the interest of the public for these purposes.

(2)  "Airport hazard" means any structure or tree or use of land which obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking-off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to the landing or taking-off of aircraft.

(3)  "Airport hazard area" means any area of land or water upon which an airport hazard might be established if not prevented as provided in this part.

(4)  "Political subdivision" means any municipality, city, town, or county.

(5)  "Structure" means any object constructed or installed by man, including buildings, towers, smokestacks, and overhead transmission lines.

(6)  "Tree" means any object of natural growth.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

